nb: Hårfarge: Kastanjebrun; Svart; Blond; Blå; Brun; Mørk kastanjebrun; Mørk blond; Mørkebrun; Mørkegrå; Mørkerød; Mørk taupe; Grå; Grønn; Lys kastanjebrun; Lys blond; Lysebrun; Lysegrå; Lyserød; Lys taupe; Mellomkastanjebrun; Mellomblond; Mellombrun; Mellomgrå; Mellomrød; Mellom-taupe; Oransje; Rosa; Lilla; Rød; Sølv; Taupe; Hvit; Gul; Annet
cs: Barva vlasů: Kaštanová; Černá; Blond; Modrá; Hnědá; Tmavě kaštanová; Tmavě blond; Tmavě hnědá; Tmavě šedá; Tmavě červená; Tmavě hnědošedá; Šedá; Zelená; Světle kaštanová; Světle blond; Světle hnědá; Světle šedá; Světle červená; Světle hnědošedá; Středně kaštanová; Středně blond; Středně hnědá; Středně šedá; Středně červená; Středně hnědošedá; Oranžová; Růžová; Purpurová; Červená; Stříbrná; Hnědošedá; Bílá; Žlutá; Jiné
en: Hair color: Auburn; Black; Blonde; Blue; Brown; Dark auburn; Dark blonde; Dark brown; Dark gray; Dark red; Dark taupe; Gray; Green; Light auburn; Light blonde; Light brown; Light gray; Light red; Light taupe; Medium auburn; Medium blonde; Medium brown; Medium gray; Medium red; Medium taupe; Orange; Pink; Purple; Red; Silver; Taupe; White; Yellow; Other
el: Χρώμα μαλλιών: Πυρόξανθο; Μαύρο; Ξανθό; Μπλε; Καστανό; Σκούρο καστανόξανθο; Σκούρο καφέ; Σκούρο καστανό; Σκούρο γκρι; Σκούρο κόκκινο; Σκούρο γκρι-μπεζ; Γκρι; Πράσινο; Ανοιχτό καστανόξανθο; Ανοιχτό ξανθό; Ανοιχτό καστανό; Ανοιχτό γκρι; Ανοιχτό κόκκινο; Ανοιχτό γκρι-μπεζ; Μέτριο καστανόξανθο; Μέτριο ξανθό; Μέτριο καστανό; Μέτριο γκρι; Μέτριο κόκκινο; Μέτριο γκρι-μπεζ; Πορτοκαλί; Ροζ; Μωβ; Κόκκινο; Ασημί; Γκρι-μπεζ; Λευκό; Κίτρινο; Άλλο
bg-BG: Цвят на косата: Кестенява; Черна; Руса; Синя; Кафява; Тъмно кестенява; Тъмно руса; Тъмно кафява; Тъмно сива; Тъмно червена; Тъмно сивкава; Сива; Зелена; Светло кестенява; Светло руса; Светло кафява; Светло сива; Светло червена; Светло сивкава; Средно кестенява; Средно руса; Средно кафява; Средно сива; Средно червена; Средно сивкава; Оранжева; Розова; Лилава; Червена; Сребриста; Сивкава; Бяла; Жълта; Други
zh-CN: 发色: 赤褐色; 黑色; 金色; 蓝色; 棕色; 深赤褐色; 暗金色; 深棕色; 深灰色; 深红色; 深灰褐色; 灰色; 绿色; 浅赤褐色; 浅金色; 浅棕色; 浅灰色; 浅红色; 浅灰褐色; 中赤褐色; 中金色; 中棕色; 中灰色; 中红色; 中灰褐色; 橙色; 粉红色; 紫色; 红色; 银色; 灰褐色; 白色; 黄色; 其他
de: Haarfarbe: Rotbraun; Schwarz; Blond; Blau; Braun; Dunkelrotbraun; Dunkelblond; Dunkelbraun; Dunkelgrau; Dunkelrot; Dunkles Taupe; Grau; Grün; Helles Rotbraun; Hellblond; Hellbraun; Hellgrau; Hellrot; Helles Taupe; Mittleres Rotbraun; Mittelblond; Mittelbraun; Mittelgrau; Mittelrot; Mittleres Taupe; Orange; Rosa; Lila; Rot; Silber; Taupe; Weiß; Gelb; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Plaukų spalva: Kaštoninė; Juoda; Šviesūs; Mėlyna; Ruda; Tamsiai kaštoninė; Tamsiai šviesi; Tamsiai ruda; Tamsiai pilka; Tamsiai raudona; Tamsiai rusva; Žili; Žalia; Šviesiai kaštoninė; Itin šviesi; Šviesiai ruda; Šviesiai pilka; Šviesiai raudona; Šviesiai rusva; Vidutinio tamsumo kaštoninė; Vidutiniškai šviesi; Vidutinio tamsumo ruda; Vidutinio tamsumo pilka; Vidutinio tamsumo raudona; Vidutinio tamsumo rusva; Oranžinė; Rožinė; Violetinė; Raudona; Sidabrinė; Rusva; Balta; Geltona; Kita
sk-SK: Farba vlasov: Gaštanový; Čierny; Blond; Modrý; Hnedý; Tmavá gaštanová; Tmavá blond; Tmavo hnedá; Tmavosivá; Tmavo červená; Tmavo šedohnedá; Šedý; Zelený; Svetlo gaštanové; Svetlá blond; Svetlo hnedá; Svetlo šedá; Svetlo červená; Svetlo šedohnedá; Stredne gaštanová; Stredne blond; Stredne hnedá; Stredne šedá; Stredne červená; Stredne tmavohnedá; Oranžový; Ružový; Fialový; Červený; Strieborný; Tmavohnedá; Biely; Žltý; Iné
fr: Coloration des cheveux: Auburn; Noir; Blonds; Bleu; Marron; Auburn foncé; Blond foncé; Marron foncé; Gris foncé; Rouge foncé; Taupe foncé; Gris; Vert; Auburn clair; Blond clair; Brun clair; Gris clair; Rouge clair; Taupe clair; Auburn moyen; Blond moyen; Brun moyen; Gris moyen; Rouge moyen; Taupe moyen; Orange; Rose; Violet; Rouge; Argent; Taupe; Blanc; Jaune; Autre
zh-TW: 髮色: 赤褐色; 黑色; 金髮; 藍; 棕色; 深赤棕紅; 暗金色; 深棕色; 深灰色; 暗紅色; 深灰褐色; 灰白; 綠色; 亮赤棕紅; 亮金; 淺棕色; 淺灰色; 亮紅色; 淺灰褐色; 中等赤棕紅; 中等金色; 中等棕色; 中等灰色; 中等紅色; 中等灰褐色; 橘色; 粉紅色; 紫色; 紅; 銀色; 灰褐色; 白; 黃色; 其他
ru: Цвет волос: Каштановый; Черный; Блонд; Синий; Коричневый; Темный каштан; Темный блонд; Темно-коричневый; Темно-серый; Темно-красный; Темный серо-коричневый; Седой; Зеленый; Светло-каштановый; Светлый блонд; Светло-коричневый; Светло-серый; Светло-красный; Светлый серо-коричневый; Средне-каштановый; Средний блонд; Средне-коричневый; Средне-серый; Средне-красный; Средне-серо-коричневый; Оранжевый; Розовый; Фиолетовый; Красный; Серебристый; Серо-коричневый; Белый; Желтый; Другое
ja: ヘアカラー: オーバーン; ブラック; ブロンド; ブルー; ブラウン; ダークオーバーン; ダークブロンド; ダークブラウン; ダークグレー; ダークレッド; ダークトープ; 白髪; グリーン; ライトオーバーン; ライトブロンド; ライトブラウン; ライトグレー; ライトレッド; ライトトープ; ミディアムオーバーン; ミディアムブロンド; ミディアムブラウン; ミディアムグレー; ミディアムレッド; ミディアムトープ; オレンジ; ピンク; パープル; レッド; シルバー; トープ; ホワイト; イエロー; その他
pl: Kolor włosów: Kasztanowy; Czarny; Blond; Niebieski; Brązowy; Ciemny kasztanowy; Ciemny blond; Ciemny brąz; Ciemny szary; Ciemny czerwony; Ciemny taupe; Siwy; Zielony; Jasny kasztanowy; Jasny blond; Jasny brąz; Jasny szary; Jasny czerwony; Jasny taupe; Średni kasztanowy; Średni blond; Średni brąz; Średni szary; Średni czerwony; Średni taupe; Pomarańczowy; Różowy; Fioletowy; Czerwony; Srebrny; Taupe; Biały; Żółty; Inne
th: ยาย้อมผม: สีน้ำตาลประกายแดง; สีดำ; บลอนด์; น้ำเงิน; สีน้ำตาล; สีน้ำตาลแดงเข้ม; สีบลอนด์เข้ม; สีน้ำตาลเข้ม; สีเทาเข้ม; สีแดงเข้ม; สีน้ำตาลอมเทาเข้ม; ผมหงอก; สีเขียว; สีน้ำตาลแดงอ่อน; สีบลอนด์อ่อน; สีน้ำตาลอ่อน; สีเทาอ่อน; สีแดงอ่อน; สีน้ำตาลอมเทาอ่อน; สีน้ำตาลแดงปานกลาง; สีบลอนด์ปานกลาง; สีน้ำตาลปานกลาง; สีเทาปานกลาง; สีแดงปานกลาง; สีน้ำตาลอมเทาปานกลาง; สีส้ม; สีชมพู; สีม่วง; แดง; ซิลเวอร์; สีน้ำตาลอมเทา; ขาว; สีเหลือง; อื่นๆ
da: Hårfarve: Auburn; Sort; Blond; Blå; Brun; Mørk auburn; Mørkeblond; Mørkebrun; Mørkegrå; Mørkerød; Mørk taupe; Grå; Grøn; Lys auburn; Lys blond; Lysebrun; Lysegrå; Lys rød; Lys taupe; Mellemauburn; Mellemblond; Mellembrun; Mellemgrå; Mellemrød; Mellemtaupe; Orange; Pink; Lilla; Rød; Sølv; Taupe; Hvid; Gul; Andet
fi: Hiusväri: Kastanjanruskea; Musta; Blondi; Sininen; Ruskea; Tumma kastanjanruskea; Tumma blondi; Tummanruskea; Tummanharmaa; Tummanpunainen; Tumma ruskeanharmaa; Harmaa; Vihreä; Vaalea kastanjanruskea; Vaalea blondi; Vaaleanruskea; Vaaleanharmaa; Vaalea punainen; Vaalea ruskeanharmaa; Keskikastanjanruskea; Keskiblondi; Keskiruskea; Keskiharmaa; Keskipunainen; Keskiruskeanharmaa; Oranssi; Vaaleanpunainen; Violetti; Punainen; Hopea; Ruskeanharmaa; Valkoinen; Keltainen; Muu
nl: Haarkleuren: Kastanjebruin; Zwart; Blond; Blauw; Bruin; Donker kastanjebruin; Donkerblond; Donkerbruin; Donkergrijs; Donkerrood; Donker taupe; Grijs; Groen; Licht kastanjebruin; Lichtblond; Lichtbruin; Lichtgrijs; Lichtrood; Licht taupe; Midden kastanjebruin; Middenblond; Middenbruin; Middengrijs; Middenrood; Midden taupe; Oranje; Roze; Paars; Rood; Zilver; Taupe; Wit; Geel; Andere
sv: Hårfärg: Kastanjebrun; Svart; Blond; Blå; Brun; Mörk kastanjebrun; Mörkblond; Mörkbrun; Mörkgrå; Mörkröd; Mörk gråbrun; Grå; Grön; Ljus kastanjebrun; Ljusblond; Ljusbrun; Ljusgrå; Ljusröd; Ljus gråbrun; Medium kastanjebrun; Medium blond; Medium brun; Medium grå; Medium röd; Medium gråbrun; Orangeröd; Rosa; Lila; Röd; Silver; Gråbrun; Vit; Gul; Övrigt
sl-SI: Barve za lase: Rdečkasto rjavi; Črna; Blond; Modri; Rjavi; Temno rdečkasto rjavi; Temno blond; Temno rjavi; Temno sivi; Temno rdeči; Temno rjavkasto sivi; Sivi; Zeleni; Svetlo rdečkasto rjavi; Svetlo blond; Svetlo rjavi; Svetlo sivi; Svetlo rdeči; Svetlo rjavkasto sivi; Srednje rdečkasto rjavi; Srednje blond; Srednje rjavi; Srednje sivi; Srednje rdeči; Srednje rjavkasto sivi; Oranžna; Rožnati; Vijolični; Rdeči; Srebrni; Rjavkasto sivi; Beli; Rumeni; Drugo
pt-BR: Tom do cabelo: Ruivo; Preto; Loiro; Azul; Castanho; Ruivo escuro; Loiro escuro; Castanho escuro; Cinza escuro; Vermelho escuro; Cinza escuro; Grisalho; Verde; Ruivo claro; Loiro claro; Castanho claro; Cinza claro; Vermelho claro; Cinza claro; Ruivo médio; Loiro médio; Castanho médio; Cinza médio; Vermelho médio; Cinza médio; Laranja; Rosa; Roxo; Vermelho; Platinado; Cinza; Branco; Amarela; Outro
it: Tintura per capelli: Ramato; Nero; Biondo; Blu; Marrone; Ramato scuro; Biondo scuro; Marrone scuro; Grigio scuro; Rosso scuro; Tortora scuro; Grigio; Verde; Ramato chiaro; Biondo chiaro; Marrone chiaro; Grigio chiaro; Rosso chiaro; Tortora chiaro; Ramato medio; Biondo medio; Marrone medio; Grigio medio; Rosso medio; Tortora medio; Arancione; Rosa; Viola; Rosso; Argento; Tortora; Bianco; Giallo; Altro
pt-PT: Cor do cabelo: Castanho-avermelhado; Preto; Loiro; Azul; Castanho; Ruivo escuro; Loiro escuro; Castanho escuro; Cinzento escuro; Vermelho escuro; Cinzento escuro; Grisalho; Verde; Castanho-avermelhado claro; Loiro claro; Castanho claro; Cinzento claro; Vermelho claro; Cinzento claro; Castanho-avermelhado médio; Louro médio; Castanho médio; Cinzento médio; Vermelho médio; Cinzento médio; Laranja; Rosa; Roxo; Tinto; Prata; Cinzento; Branco; Amarelo; Outro
hr-HR: Boja kose: Kestenjasta; Crna; Plava kosa; Plava; Smeđa; Tamno kestenjasta; Tamno plava; Tamno smeđa; Tamno siva; Tamno crvena; Tamno sivo-smeđa; Sijeda; Zelena; Svijetlo kestenjasta; Svijetlo plava; Svijetlo smeđa; Svijetlo siva; Svijetlo crvena; Svijetlo sivo-smeđa; Srednje kestenjasta; Srednje plava; Srednje smeđa; Srednje siva; Srednje crvena; Srednje sivo-smeđa; Narančasta; Ružičasta; Ljubičasta; Crvena; Srebrna; Sivo-smeđa; Bijela; Žuta; Ostalo
hu: Hajszín: Gesztenyebarna; Fekete; Szőke; Kék; Barna; Sötét gesztenyebarna; Sötétszőke; Sötétbarna; Sötétszürke; Sötétvörös; Sötét szürkésbarna; Szürke; Zöld; Világos gesztenyebarna; Világosszőke; Világosbarna; Világosszürke; Világosvörös; Világos szürkésbarna; Közép gesztenyebarna; Középszőke; Középbarna; Középszürke; Középvörös; Közép szürkésbarna; Narancssárga; Rózsaszín; Lila; Vörös; Ezüst; Szürkésbarna; Fehér; Sárga; Egyéb
vi: Màu tóc: Màu nâu vàng; Màu đen; Tóc vàng; Màu xanh dương; Màu nâu; Màu nâu vàng đậm; Màu vàng sẫm; Màu nâu tối; Màu xám đen; Màu đỏ sẫm; Màu nâu sẫm; Màu xám; Màu xanh lá cây; Màu nâu vàng nhạt; Màu vàng sáng; Màu nâu nhạt; Màu xám nhạt; Màu đỏ nhạt; Màu nâu sẫm nhạt; Màu nâu vàng vừa; Tóc vàng vừa; Màu nâu vừa; Màu xám vừa; Màu đỏ vừa; Màu nâu sẫm vừa; Màu cam; Màu hồng; Màu tím; Màu đỏ; Bạc; Màu nâu sẫm; Màu trắng; Màu vàng; Khác
es: Coloración: Castaño; Negro; Rubio; Azul; Marrón; Castaño oscuro; Rubio oscuro; Marrón oscuro; Gris oscuro; Rojo oscuro; Topo oscuro; Gris; Verde; Castaño claro; Rubio claro; Marrón claro; Gris claro; Rojo claro; Topo claro; Castaño medio; Rubio medio; Marrón medio; Gris medio; Rojo medio; Topo medio; Naranja; Rosa; Púrpura; Rojo; Plateado; Topo; Blanco; Amarillo; Otros
ko: 헤어 컬러: 적갈색; 검은색; 금발; 블루; 갈색; 진한 적갈색; 진한 금발; 진한 갈색; 짙은 회색; 진한 빨간색; 진한 회갈색; 회색; 녹색; 밝은 적갈색; 밝은 금발; 연한 갈색; 연한 회색; 연한 빨간색; 연한 회갈색; 중간 적갈색; 중간 금발; 중간 갈색; 중간 회색; 중간 빨간색; 중간 회갈색; 주황색; 분홍색; 보라색; 레드; 은색; 회갈색; 화이트; 옐로우; 기타
tr: Saç rengi: Kumral; Siyah; Sarışın; Mavi; Kahverengi; Koyu kumral; Koyu sarışın; Koyu kahverengi; Koyu gri; Koyu kızıl; Koyu boz kahverengi; Gri; Yeşil; Açık kumral; Açık sarışın; Açık kahverengi; Açık gri; Açık kızıl; Açık boz kahverengi; Orta kumral; Orta sarışın; Orta kahverengi; Orta gri; Orta kızıl; Orta boz kahverengi; Turuncu; Pembe; Mor; Kızıl; Gümüş; Boz kahverengi; Beyaz; Sarı; Diğer
ro-RO: Vopsea de păr: Castaniu roșcat; Brunet; Blond; Albastru; Șaten; Castaniu-roșcat închis; Blond închis; Șaten închis; Gri închis; Roșcat închis; Castaniu rece închis; Gri; Verde; Castaniu-roșcat deschis; Blond deschis; Șaten deschis; Gri deschis; Roșcat deschis; Castaniu rece deschis; Castaniu-roșcat mediu; Blond mediu; Șaten mediu; Gri mediu; Roșcat mediu; Castaniu rece mediu; Portocaliu; Roz; Violet; Roșu; Argintiu; Castaniu rece; Alb; Galben; Altele